Utah statutes.
59-5-203.   Determining taxable value.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the basis for computing the gross
proceeds, prior to those deductions or adjustments specified in this chapter,
in determining the taxable value of the metals or metalliferous minerals sold
or otherwise disposed of, in the order of priority, is as follows:
(a)  If the metals or metalliferous mineral products are actually sold, the
value of those metals or metalliferous mineral products shall be the gross
amount the producer receives from that sale, provided that the metals or
metalliferous mineral products are sold under a bona fide contract of sale
between unaffiliated parties.  In the case of a sale of uranium concentrates,
gross proceeds shall be the gross amount the producer receives from the sale
of processed uranium concentrate or "yellowcake," provided that the uranium
concentrate is sold under a bona fide contract of sale between unaffiliated
parties.
(b)  If the metals or metalliferous mineral products are not actually sold but
are shipped, transported, or delivered out of state, the gross proceeds shall
be the multiple of the recoverable units of finished metals, or of the
finished metals contained in the metalliferous minerals shipped, and the
average daily price per unit of contained metals as quoted by an established
authority for market prices of metals for the period during which the tax
imposed by this chapter is due.  The established authority or authorities
shall be designated by the commission by rule adopted in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(c)  In the case of metals or metalliferous minerals not sold, but otherwise
disposed of, for which there is no established authority for market prices of
metals for the period during which the tax imposed by this chapter is due,
gross proceeds is determined by allocating to the state the same proportion of
the producer's total sales of metals or metalliferous minerals sold or
otherwise disposed of as the producer's total Utah costs bear to the total
costs associated with sale or disposal of the metal or metalliferous mineral.
(d)  In the event of a sale of metals or metalliferous minerals between
affiliated companies which is not a bona fide sale because the value received
is not proportionate to the fair market value of the metals or metalliferous
minerals or in the event that Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) are not
applicable, the commission shall determine the value of such metals or
metalliferous minerals in an equitable manner by reference to an objective
standard as specified in a rule adopted in accordance with the provisions of
Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(2)  For all metals except beryllium, the taxable value of the metalliferous
mineral sold or otherwise disposed of is 30% of the gross proceeds received
for the metals sold or otherwise disposed of by the producer of the metal.
(3) (a)  Beginning on January 1, 1990, through December 31, 2004, for
beryllium sold or otherwise disposed of, the taxable value is 20% of the gross
proceeds received for the beryllium sold or otherwise disposed of by the
producer.
(b) (i)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1) or (4) and subject to Subsection
(3)(b)(ii), beginning on January 1, 2005, the taxable value of beryllium sold
or otherwise disposed of by the producer of the beryllium is equal to 125% of
the direct mining costs incurred in mining the beryllium.
(ii)  For an action or proceeding filed on or after January 1, 2005, if the
taxable value of beryllium is calculated under Subsection (3)(a) for purposes
of imposing a tax on beryllium under this part, the taxable value of beryllium
calculated under Subsection (3)(a) may not exceed the taxable value of
beryllium calculated under Subsection (3)(b)(i).
(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), if the metalliferous mineral sold
or otherwise disposed of is sold or shipped out of state in the form of ore,
then the taxable value is 80% of the gross proceeds.
